Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Health Carrier Grievance Procedure Act is to provide standards for the establishment and maintenance of procedures by health carriers to assure that covered persons have the opportunity for the appropriate resolution of their grievances as defined in the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 67.